Arkansas, session 2025, SB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 35, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-35-214. Operation of motor vehicle with a modified bumper —
Offense.
(a) A person commits the offense of operation of a motor vehicle with
a modified bumper if:
(1) He or she operates a passenger car, pickup truck, sports
utility vehicle, or panel truck on a public highway or street; and
(2) The suspension, frame, or chassis of the motor vehicle has
been modified by any means to cause the height of the front bumper of the
motor vehicle to be at least four inches (4") in height greater than the
height of the rear bumper of the motor vehicle.
(b)(1) The offense of operation of a motor vehicle with a modified
bumper is a violation subject to a fine of:
*ZRC060*
03/10/2025 9:31:00 AM ZRC060

SB411
(A) Two hundred fifty ($250) dollars for the first offense
in a twelve-month period; and
(B) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a second or subsequent
offense in a twelve-month period; and
(2) In addition to the fine imposed under subdivision (b)(1)(B)
of this section, for a third offense in a twelve-month period, the offender's
driver's license shall be suspended for twelve (12) months from the date of
conviction for the third offense.
(c) An offense under this section is a strict liability offense.



























03/10/2025 9:31:00 AM ZRC060